Utah statutes.
19-6-718.   Limitations on liability of operator of collection center.
(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), a person may not recover from the owner,
operator, or lessor of a DIYer used oil collection center any costs of
response actions at another location resulting from a release or threatened
release of used oil collected at the center if the owner, operator, or lessor:
(a)  operates the DIYer used oil collection center in compliance with this
part and rules made under this part and the executive secretary upon
inspection finds the center is in compliance with this part and rules made
under this part;
(b)  does not mix any used oil collected with any hazardous waste or PCBs or
with any material that would render the resulting mixture as a hazardous
waste;
(c)  does not knowingly accept any used oil containing hazardous waste or
PCBs;
(d)  ensures the used oil is transported from the center by a permitted used
oil transporter; and
(e)  complies with Section 114(c) of the federal Comprehensive Environmental
Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, as amended.
(2) (a)  This section applies only to that portion of a used oil collection
center used for the collection of DIYer used oil under this part.
(b)  This section does not apply to willful or grossly negligent activities of
the owner, operator, or lessor in operating the DIYer used oil collection
center.
(c)  This section does not affect or modify in any way the obligations or
liability of any person other than the owner, operator, or lessor under any
other provisions of state or federal law, including common law, for injury or
damage resulting from a release of used oil or hazardous waste.
(d)  For the purposes of this section, the owner, operator, or lessor of a
DIYer used oil collection center may presume a quantity of not more than five
gallons, except under Subsection (2)(e), of used oil accepted from a member of
the public is not mixed with a hazardous waste or PCBs if:
(i)  the oil is accepted in accordance with the inspection and identification
procedures required by board rule; and
(ii)  the owner, operator, or lessor operates the DIYer used oil collection
center in good faith and in compliance with this part and rules made under
this part.
(e)  The owner, operator, or lessor of a DIYer used oil collection center may
claim the presumption under Subsection (2)(d) for a quantity of more than five
gallons but not more than 55 gallons, if the quantity received is:
(i)  from a farmer exempted under Subsection 19-6-708(1)(b);
(ii)  generated by farming equipment; and
(iii)  handled in accordance with all requirements of this section.
(f)  This section does not affect or modify the obligations or liability of
any owner, operator, or lessor of a DIYer used oil collection center regarding
that person's services or functions other than accepting DIYer used oil under
this part.
